Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 2. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 104. CERTAIN EXPENSES PAID BY STATE OR COUNTY

Art. 104.001. JURY PAY AND EXPENSES FOR JURORS. (a) The sheriff of a county shall, with the approval of the commissioners court, provide food and lodging for jurors impaneled in a felony case tried in the county. A juror may pay his own expenses and draw his script.

(b) A juror in a felony case is entitled to receive as jury pay the amount authorized by Article 2122, Revised Statutes.

(c) The county treasurer shall pay a juror the amount due the juror for expenses under this article after receiving a certificate from a clerk of a court or justice of the peace stating the amount due the juror.

(d) A draft or certificate issued under this article may be transferred by delivery and, without further action of any authority except registration by the county treasurer, may be used at par to pay county taxes owed by the holder of the draft or certificate.

(e) If a defendant is indicted in one county and tried in another county after a change of venue, the county in which the defendant was indicted is liable for jury pay and expenses paid to jurors by the county trying the case.

(f) At each regular meeting of the commissioners court of a county, the court shall determine whether, since the last regular meeting of the court, a defendant described by Subsection (e) has been tried in the county. The commissioners court shall prepare an account against another county liable for jury pay and expenses under this article. The account must show the number of days the jury was impaneled in the case and the jury pay and expenses incurred by the county in the case.

(g) The county judge of the county in which the defendant was tried shall certify the correctness of the account and send the account to the county judge of the county in which the defendant was indicted. The county in which the defendant was indicted shall pay the account in the same manner required for payment of the expenses of transferred prisoners under Article 104.002.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Art. 104.002. EXPENSES FOR PRISONERS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this article, a county is liable for all expenses incurred in the safekeeping of prisoners confined in the county jail or kept under guard by the county. If a prisoner is transferred to a county from another county on a change of venue, for safekeeping, or for a habeas corpus hearing, the county transferring the prisoner is liable for the expenses described by this article.

(b) If a county incurs expenses for the safekeeping of a prisoner from another county, the sheriff shall submit to the county judge an account of expenses incurred by the county for the prisoner. The county judge shall approve the amount he determines is a correct statement of the expenses and sign and date the account.

(c) The county judge shall submit to the commissioners court of the county for which the prisoner was kept, at a regular term of the court, his signed statement of the account described by Subsection (b). If the commissioners court determines that the account is in accordance with the law, it shall order the county treasurer to issue to the sheriff of the county submitting the statement a draft in an amount approved by the court.

(d) A person who is or was a prisoner in a county jail and received medical, dental, or health related services from a county or a hospital district shall be required to pay a reimbursement fee for such services when they are rendered. If such prisoner is an eligible county resident as defined in Section 61.002, Health and Safety Code, the county or hospital district providing the services has a right of subrogation to the prisoner's right of recovery from any source, limited to the cost of services provided. A prisoner, unless the prisoner fully pays for the cost of services received, shall remain obligated to reimburse the county or hospital district for any medical, dental, or health services provided, and the county or hospital district may apply for reimbursement in the manner provided by Chapter 61, Health and Safety Code. A county or hospital district shall have authority to recover the amount expended in a civil action.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Subsec. (d) amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1010, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 284(19), eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 434, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 3.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.41, eff. January 1, 2020.

Art. 104.003. STATE PAYMENT OF CERTAIN PROSECUTION COSTS. (a) In a prosecution of a criminal offense or delinquent conduct committed on property owned or operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or the Texas Juvenile Justice Department, or committed by or against a person in the custody of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice or the Texas Juvenile Justice Department while the person is performing a duty away from Texas Department of Criminal Justice or Texas Juvenile Justice Department property, the state shall reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county, in an amount that the court determines to be reasonable, for payment of:

(1) salaries and expenses of foreign language interpreters and interpreters for deaf persons whose services are necessary to the prosecution;

(2) consultation fees of experts whose assistance is directly related to the prosecution;

(3) travel expenses for witnesses;

(4) expenses for the food, lodging, and compensation of jurors;

(5) compensation of witnesses;

(6) the cost of preparation of a statement of facts and a transcript of the trial for purposes of appeal;

(7) if the death of a person is an element of the offense, expenses of an inquest relating to the death;

(8) food, lodging, and travel expenses incurred by the prosecutor's staff during travel essential to the prosecution of the offense;

(9) court reporter's fees; and

(10) the cost of special security officers.

(b) If there is a change of venue, the court may, in its discretion, determine that a special prosecutor should be hired for the prosecution of an offense described in Section (a), and the state shall reimburse the county for the salary and expenses of the special prosecutor if the court determines that the hiring of the special prosecutor was reasonable and necessary for effective prosecution. The amount of reimbursement may not exceed an amount that the court determines to be reasonable.

(c) The court shall certify the amount of reimbursement for expenses under Sections (a) and (b) on presentation by the county of an itemized and verified receipt for those expenses.

(d) The state shall reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county for the investigation of an offense described in Section (a), whether or not the investigation results in the prosecution of an offense, and shall reimburse the county for reasonable operational expenses of the special prison prosecution unit, including educational activities for the staff and general expenses relating to its investigative and prosecutorial duties.

(e) The court shall certify the amount of reimbursement for expenses under Sections (a) and (b) to the comptroller. The comptroller shall issue a warrant in that amount to the commissioners court of the county or, if the comptroller determines that the amount certified by the court is unreasonable, in an amount that the comptroller determines to be reasonable.

(f) The commissioners court of the county shall certify the amount of reimbursement for expenses under Section (d) to the comptroller. The comptroller shall issue a warrant in that amount to the commissioners court or, if the comptroller determines that the amount certified by the commissioners court is unreasonable, in an amount that the comptroller determines to be reasonable.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the expenses submitted by the county for reimbursement may not exceed the amount the county would pay for the same activity or service, if that activity or service was not reimbursed by the state. The county judge shall certify compliance with this section on request by the comptroller.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 5.06(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Subsecs. (a), (d) amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 461, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989; Subsec. (a) amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 14, Sec. 284(60), eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (S.B. 103), Sec. 3, eff. June 8, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2015.

Art. 104.004. EXTRAORDINARY COSTS OF PROSECUTION. (a) The criminal justice division of the governor's office may distribute money appropriated by the legislature for the purposes of this article to a county for the reimbursement of expenses incurred by the county during the fiscal year during which application is made or the fiscal year preceding the year during which application is made for the investigation or prosecution of an offense under Section 19.03, Penal Code, or an offense under the Penal Code alleged by the attorney representing the state to have been committed for a purpose or reason described by Article 42.014.

(b) For each fiscal year, the division shall distribute at least 50 percent of the money distributed under this article during that year to counties with a population of less than 50,000, except that if the total distributions applied for by those counties is less than 50 percent of the money distributed during that year, the division is only required to distribute to those counties the amount of money for which applications have been made.

(c) The division may adopt a budget and rules for the distribution of money under this article.

(d) All money distributed to a county under this article and its expenditure by the county are subject to audit by the state auditor.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 664, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 85, Sec. 2.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.